en: Strawberry coulis, Strawberry sauce
fr: Coulis de fraise
hr: Coulis od jagoda
hu: Eper öntet
nl: Aardbeiencoulis

en: Raspberry coulis, Raspberry sauce
de: Himbeer-Coulis, Himbeersauce
fr: Coulis de framboise
hr: Malina coulis
hu: Málna öntet
nl: Frambozencoulis

en: Blackcurrant coulis
fr: Coulis de cassis

en: Bilberry coulis
de: Heidelbeeren Coulis
es: Coulis de arándano
fr: Coulis de myrtille
hr: Borovnica coulis
it: Coulis di mirtillo
lt: Mėlynės čatnis
nl: Bosbessencoulis

en: Apricot coulis, Apricot sauce
fr: Coulis d'abricot
hr: Kulis od marelice
hu: Sárgabarack öntet
nl: Abrikozencoulis

en: Mango coulis
de: Mango Coulis
es: Coulis de mango
fr: Coulis de mangue
hr: Mango coulis
it: Coulis di mango
lt: Mangų čatnis
nl: Mangocoulis

en: Fruits desserts, Fruits dessert
fr: Desserts de fruits, Dessert de fruits
hr: Voćni deserti
lt: Vaisių desertai, Desertai iš vaisių

en: Compotes, Stewed fruits
bg: Компоти
ca: Compotes
de: Kompotte, Kompott, Röster
es: Compotas
fi: kompotit
fr: Compotes, Compotes de fruits
he: לפתנים, לפתן, קומפוטים, קומפוט
hr: Kompoti
hu: Kompótok
it: Composte, composta
ja: コンポート
lt: Tyrės, Tyrelės
nl: Compotes
pt: Compotas
ru: Компот
zh: 蜜饯

fr: Compotes de framboise
nl: Frambozencompotes

en: Plum compotes
fr: Compotes de prunes
hr: Kompoti od šljiva
nl: Pruimencompotes

en: Fruits compote with reduced sugar
fr: Compote de fruits allégée en sucres
hr: Voćni kompot sa smanjenim šećerom
lt: Vaisių tyrės su sumažintu cukraus kiekiu

en: Refrigerated fruits compote with reduced sugar
fr: Compote de fruits allégée en sucres rayon frais

en: Fruits puree without sugar added
fr: Purée de fruits sans sucres ajoutés, Compote de fruits sans sucres ajoutés
hr: Voćni pire bez dodanog šećera
lt: Vaisių tyrė be cukraus

en: Peach melba with vanilla ice cream and raspberry sauce, Peach melba
fr: Pêche melba

en: Compotes to drink
de: Trinkkompotte
es: Compotas para beber
fi: juotavat kompotit
fr: Compotes à boire
hr: Kompoti za piće
it: Composte da bere
lt: Geriamos tyrelės
nl: Drinkcompotes
pl: Kompoty

en: Light compotes
de: Leichte Kompotte
es: Compotas ligeras, Compotas light
fi: kevyet kompotit
fr: Compotes allégées, Compote allégée, Compotes allégées en sucres, Compote allégée en sucres
hr: Lagani kompoti
nl: Light compotes

fr: Compotes sans sucres, purées de fruits
de: Zuckerfreie Kompotte, Fruchtpürees
es: Compotas sin azúcar, purés de frutas
it: Composte senza zuccheri, puree di frutta
nl: Suikervrije compotes, vruchtenpuree

en: Strawberry compotes
bg: Компот от ягоди
de: Erdbeerkompott
es: Compotas de fresa
fr: Compotes de fraise
hr: Kompoti od jagoda
it: Composte di fragola
lt: Braškinės tyrės, Tyrės su braškėmis
nl: Aardbeiencompotes

fr: Compotes fraise groseille
nl: Aardbeien-aalbessencompotes

en: Strawberry and blueberry compotes
de: Erdbeer-Blaubeer-Kompott, Blaubeer-Erdbeer-Kompott, Erdbeer-Heidelbeer-Kompott
fr: Compotes fraise myrtille
hr: Kompoti od jagoda i borovnica
lt: Braškių ir mėlinių tyrės
nl: Aardbeien-bosbessencompotes